Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-116
County official, defined.

The term county official shall include any county officer or employee of a county officer who is charged with the duty of valuing, assessing, or equalizing property for property tax purposes.

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 3.